Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 245, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 92, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 245), is amended to read as follows:
Section 245. A. The Climate Office of the State of Oklahoma
located at Norman, Oklahoma, shall be under the direction and
supervision of the Board of Regents of the University of Oklahoma
and shall be known as the Oklahoma Climatological Survey. The
Oklahoma Climatological Survey is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2026 2031, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law.
B. The director of the Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall be
appointed by the Board and shall either serve as the state
climatologist or appoint another current employee of the Survey to
serve as state climatologist. The salary of the director shall be
determined by the Board.

C. The Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall have for its object
and duties the following:
1. To acquire, archive, process and disseminate, in the most
cost-effective way possible, all climate and weather information
which is or could be of value to policy and decision makers in the
state;
2. To act as the representative of the state in all
climatological and meteorological matters both within and outside
the state when requested to do so by the legislative or executive
branches of the state government;
3. To prepare, publish and disseminate periodic regular climate
summaries for those individuals, agencies and organizations whose
activities are related to the welfare of the state and are affected
by climate and weather;
4. To conduct and report on studies of climate and weather
phenomena of significant socioeconomic importance to the state;
5. To evaluate the significance of natural and man-made,
deliberate and inadvertent changes or modifications in important
features of the climate and weather affecting the state, and to
report this information to those agencies and organizations in the
state who are likely to be affected by such changes or
modifications; and
6. To maintain and operate the Oklahoma Mesonetwork, a
statewide environmental monitoring network which is overseen by the
Mesonet Steering Committee, comprised of representatives of the
University of Oklahoma and Oklahoma State University according to
its Memorandum of Agreement. The director of the Oklahoma
Climatological Survey shall be accountable for executing the
policies of the Mesonet Steering Committee.
D. The director is authorized to certify copies as being
authentic reproductions of weather records held in the state.
E. The director of the Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall
present a report each year to the Board of Regents of the University
of Oklahoma showing the progress, condition and all other
information which the Board may deem necessary.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3005 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3005 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 20th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3005 Page 4